Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3619
Board; compensation; expenses.

The voting members of the board, while engaged in the performance of their official duties, shall receive compensation at the rate of fifty dollars per day while so serving, including travel time. In addition, members of the board shall receive reimbursement for expenses on the same basis and subject to the same conditions as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 19;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 10.